Hawaii statutes.
§171-71 Definitions. As used in this
part if not inconsistent with the context:

"Appraisers" means one or more, but
not more than three, real estate appraisers appointed by the board.

"Lessee" means the lessee under a
residential lease and the successors in interest of the lessee.

"Person" means one or more
individuals and does not include any partnership, firm, or corporation.

"Residential lease" or
"lease" means a residential lease made by the board of land and
natural resources under this part. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-67; HRS
§171-71]

Revision Note

Definitions
rearranged.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next